Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 1. County Boundaries
§ 19-1-69.
Kemper County.

Kemper County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township twelve, range fourteen, east; thence east between townships twelve and thirteen to the boundary line with the State of Alabama; thence southerly on said boundary line to the line between townships eight and nine, north; thence west with said township line to the line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is DeKalb.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 47; 1871, § 50; 1880, § 54; 1892, § 378; 1906, § 441; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3861; 1930, § 3922; 1942, § 3057; Laws, Dec. 23, 1823.

§ 19-1-71.
Lafayette County.

Lafayette County is bounded by beginning at the center of township six, range five, west; thence east on the section line to Little Spring creek; thence southeasterly down said creek to its intersection with the Tallahatchie River; thence up said river to the basis meridian of the Chickasaw survey; thence south on the said meridian line to the line between townships ten and eleven; thence west on said township line to the southwest corner of section thirty-four, township ten, range three, west; thence north to the southwest corner of section twenty-two, township ten, range three, west; thence west to the southwest corner of section twenty-two, township ten, range five, west; thence north to the beginning. The county site is Oxford.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 74; 1871, § 51; 1880, § 55; 1892, § 379; 1906, § 442; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3862; 1930, § 3923; 1942, § 3058; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836.

§ 19-1-73.
Lamar County.

Lamar County is bounded and described as commencing at the northwest corner of township five, north, range sixteen west; thence running south along the range line between ranges sixteen and seventeen to the thirty-first parallel of latitude, said point being the southwest corner of township one, north, range sixteen, west; thence east along the said thirty-first parallel of latitude to the southeast corner of township one, north, range sixteen, west; thence north one mile to the north boundary line of Pearl River county as it existed prior to the adoption of the Code of 1930; thence east, parallel with said thirty-first parallel of latitude, to the section line between sections twenty-seven and twenty-eight, township one, north, range fifteen, west; thence south to the thirty-first parallel of latitude; thence east to the northeast corner of section three, township one, south, range fifteen, west; thence south to the southeast corner of section three, township one, south, range fifteen, west; thence east along section lines to the section corner common to sections five, six, seven, and eight in township one, south, range fourteen, west; thence north to the said thirty-first parallel of latitude; thence east to the center or half-section line of section thirty-two of township one, north, range fourteen, west; thence north on half-section line of section thirty-two, township one, north, range fourteen, west, to the south line of section twenty-nine; thence east along section lines to the range line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, west; thence north along said range line to the northeast corner of township four, north, range fourteen, west; thence west to the northwest corner of said last mentioned township; thence north along the range line between ranges fourteen and fifteen to the northeast corner of township five, north, range fifteen, west; thence west twelve miles to the point of beginning. The county site is Purvis.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 443; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3863; 1930, § 3924; 1942, § 3059; Laws, Mar. 10, 1904; Laws, 1934, ch. 238.

§ 19-1-75.
Lauderdale County.

Lauderdale County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township eight, range fourteen, east; thence east on the said township line to the state boundary with the State of Alabama; thence southerly with the said boundary line to the line between townships four and five, north; thence west with said township line to the line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is Meridian.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 48; 1871, § 52; 1880, § 56; 1892, § 380; 1906, § 444; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3864; 1930, § 3925; 1942, § 3060; Laws, Dec. 23, 1823.

§ 19-1-77.
Lawrence County.

Lawrence County is bounded as beginning at the southwest corner of township five, north, range ten, east, thence east along the line separating townships four and five to the northeast corner of section five, township four, north, range eleven, east; thence south with the east boundary line of section five to the northeast corner of the southeast quarter of said section five; thence east along the half section line of section four to the northeast corner of the southeast quarter of said section four; thence south with the east boundary of section four to the southeast corner of said section four; thence east along the south boundary line of section three to the southeast corner of the southwest quarter of said section three; thence south along the half section line of section ten to the center of section ten; thence east along the half section line of sections ten, eleven and twelve to the southeast corner of the southwest quarter of the northwest quarter of said section twelve, township four, north, range eleven, east; thence north along the east boundary of the southwest quarter of the northwest quarter of section twelve to the northeast corner of the southwest quarter of the northwest quarter of said section; thence east along the south boundary line of the northeast quarter of the northwest quarter of section twelve to the southeast corner of the northeast quarter of the northwest quarter of section twelve; thence north along the half section line of section twelve to the northeast corner of the northwest quarter of section twelve; thence east along the north boundary line of section twelve to the northeast corner of said section twelve and until it intersects the line between ranges eleven and twelve, east; thence north along the said range line to the southwest corner of section eighteen, township five, north, range twelve east; thence east with the section lines to the Pearl River; thence up said river with its meanderings to where the the line between sections thirteen and twenty-four in township five, north range twenty, west, intersects said river; thence east to the range line between ranges nineteen and twenty, west; thence north along said range line to the township line between townships six and seven; thence west along the township line between township six and seven one mile to the southwest corner of section thirty-six in township seven, range twenty, west; thence north along section lines to the Old Choctaw boundary line; thence westwardly along the Old Choctaw boundary line to the point where the same is intersected by the range line between ranges nine and ten, east; thence south on said range line to the place of beginning. The county site is Monticello.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 53; 1880, § 57; 1892, § 381; 1906, § 445; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3865; 1930, § 3926; 1942, § 3061; Laws, Dec. 22, 1814; Laws, 1908, ch. 153.

§ 19-1-79.
Leake County.

Leake County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township twelve, range six, east; thence east on the line between townships twelve and thirteen to the range line between ranges nine and ten, east; thence south on said range line to the township line between townships eight and nine; thence west on said line to the range line between ranges five and six, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is Carthage.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 60; 1871, § 54; 1880, § 58; 1892, § 382; 1906, § 446; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3866; 1930, § 3927; 1942, § 3062; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-81.
Lee County.

Lee County is bounded by beginning at the southwest corner of section seven, township eight, range five, east; thence east with the section line to the southeast corner of section eight, in the same township; thence north on the section lines to the southeast corner of section five, township seven, range five, east; thence east to the southwest corner of section one, in the same township; thence north to the northwest corner of the same section; thence east on the township line to the northeast corner of section three, township seven, range seven, east; thence south on section lines to the northeast corner of section thirty-four, township eleven, range seven, east; thence west on section lines to the line between ranges five and six, east; thence south on said range line to the line between townships eleven and twelve; thence west on said township line to the southeast corner of section thirty-six, township eleven, range four, east; thence north on range line between four and five to the northeast corner of section twenty-five, township eight, range four, east; thence north on range line between four and five to the point of beginning. The county site is Tupelo.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 55; 1880, § 59; 1892, § 383; 1906, § 447; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3867; 1930, § 3928; 1942, § 3063; Laws, Oct. 26, 1866; Laws, 1908, ch. 154.

§ 19-1-83.
Leflore County.

Leflore County is bounded by beginning at the southwest corner of township seventeen, range two west; thence south along the western boundary line of section seven, township sixteen, range two west, to the Choctaw boundary line; thence southeasterly along said Choctaw boundary line to the Yazoo River; thence up said river to the northwest corner of Holmes County; thence southeast along the line of Holmes County to the point at which said line is crossed by the lines between sections fourteen and fifteen, township seventeen, range one, east; thence north with section line to the southwest corner of section fourteen, township eighteen, range one, east; thence east to range line between ranges one and two, east; thence north on said line to the northwest corner of township eighteen, range two, east; thence east to the southeast corner of section thirty-two, township nineteen, range two, east; thence north to the northeast corner of section seventeen, township twenty, range two, east; thence west by section lines to the middle of the Yalobusha River; thence with its meanderings to the Grenada County line; thence west along the said line to the southwest corner of Grenada County; thence north on the Grenada County line to the southern boundary of township twenty-two; thence west along said line to the west bank of the Tallahatchie River; thence up said river to the point at which it is crossed by the northern boundary of township twenty-two; thence west on said line to the southwest corner of Tallahatchie County; thence south on the range line between ranges two and three, west, to the beginning. The county site is Greenwood.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 57; 1880, § 60; 1892, § 384; 1906, § 448; Hemingway’s 1917; § 3868; 1930, § 3929; 1942, § 3064; Laws, Mar. 15, 1871; Laws, 1940, ch. 322.

§ 19-1-85.
Lincoln County.

Lincoln County is bounded by beginning at a point on the old Choctaw boundary line where the line between townships eight and nine intersects the same; thence east on said township line to the northwest corner of section four, township eight, range eight, east; thence south to the southwest corner of said section; thence east to the southeast corner of section three in the same township; thence north to the line between said townships eight and nine; thence east on said township line to the Choctaw boundary; thence northeast to the line between ranges nine and ten, east; thence south with said range line to the line between townships four and five, north; thence west with said township line to a point one mile east of the line between ranges five and six, east; thence north on section lines to the township line between townships seven and eight; thence west to the Choctaw boundary line where the line between townships seven and eight intersects the same; thence north with the Choctaw boundary line to the beginning. The county site is Brookhaven.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 57; 1880, § 61; 1892, § 385; 1906, § 449; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3869; 1930, § 3930; 1942, § 3065; Laws, Apr. 7, 1870.

§ 19-1-87.
Lowndes County.

Lowndes County is bounded by beginning at the southwest corner of section eighteen, township nineteen, range sixteen, east; thence east to the southwest corner of section fourteen, township nineteen, range sixteen, east; to Catalpa creek; thence down its meanderings to its junction with Tibbee creek; thence with Tibbee creek to its junction with the Tombigbee River; thence with it, and by the middle thereof, to the mouth of Buttahatchie River; thence up said river with its meanderings to a point immediately west of Robinson’s bluff, which point is where the middle line (east and west) of the north half of south half of section 21, township 15, range 17 west intersects with the center line of said Buttahatchie River, thence due east to Robinson’s bluff, and continuing east along the subdivision line named across sections 21, 22, 23, and 24, township 15, range 17 west, and across section 19, township 15, range 16 west to Mississippi and Alabama State line; thence southerly with said line to the line between townships sixteen and seventeen, north; thence west on said township line to the southwest corner of township seventeen, range sixteen, east; thence north on the line between ranges fifteen and sixteen to the beginning. The county site is Columbus.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 41; 1871, § 58; 1880, § 62; 1892, § 386; 1906, § 450; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3870; 1930, § 3931; 1942, § 3066; Laws, Jan. 30, 1830; Laws, 1944, ch. 409.

§ 19-1-89.
Madison County.

Madison County is bounded by beginning at a point on Big Black River, where the same crosses the center line in township twelve, range three, east; thence east to the old Choctaw boundary line; thence north on said boundary line to the center line of township twelve, range five, east; thence through the center of said township twelve, range five, east, to the range line between townships five and six, east; thence south on said range line to Pearl River; thence down said river, with its meanderings, to the line between townships six and seven, north; thence west on said township line to the basis meridian of the Choctaw survey; thence north on said meridian line to the line between townships seven and eight, north; thence west on said township line to the line between ranges two and three, west; thence north on said range line to Big Black River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the beginning. The county site is Canton.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 59; 1880, § 63; 1892, § 387; 1906, § 451; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3871; 1930, § 3932; 1942, § 3067; Laws, Jan. 29, 1828.

§ 19-1-91.
Marion County.

Marion County is bounded by beginning on the line between ranges eleven and twelve east at the southwest corner of section eighteen, township five, north, range twelve, east; thence east along the section lines to Pearl River, thence up said river with its meanderings to where the line between sections thirteen and twenty-four in township five, north, range twenty, west, intersects said river; thence east with section lines to the southeast corner of section seventeen, township five, north, range eighteen, west; thence north with section lines to the northeast corner of section five, township five, north, range eighteen, west; thence east with township lines to the range line between ranges sixteen and seventeen, west; thence south on the range line to where it intersects the thirty-first parallel of latitude; thence west along said thirty-first parallel to the range line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, east; thence north along said range line to the northeast corner of section twelve, township one, north, range thirteen, east; thence west along north section lines of sections twelve, eleven, ten, nine and eight to the northwest corner of section eight, township one, north, range thirteen, east; thence north to the southwest corner of section thirty-two, township two, north, range thirteen, east; thence west along township line one-half mile to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of section thirty-one, township two, north, range thirteen, east; thence north one and one-half miles to the center of section thirty, township two, north, range thirteen, east; thence west one-half mile to the range line between ranges twelve and thirteen, east; thence north on the said range line one and one-half miles to the southeast corner of section thirteen, township two, north, range twelve, east; thence west along the south boundary lines of sections thirteen, fourteen, fifteen and sixteen to the southwest corner of section sixteen, township two, north, range twelve, east; thence north along section lines to township line between townships two and three, north, range twelve, east, this point being at the southwest corner of section thirty-three, township three, north, range twelve, east; thence west one and one-half miles along the township line to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of section thirty-one, township three, north, range twelve, east; and thence north along the half section line dividing sections thirty-one, thirty, nineteen and eighteen to the northwest corner of the northeast quarter of section eighteen, township three, north, range twelve, east; thence west one-half mile to the range line between ranges eleven and twelve, east, this point being at the southwest corner of section seven, township three, north, range twelve, east; thence north along the range line between ranges eleven and twelve eleven miles to the point of beginning. The county site is Columbia.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 60; 1880, § 64; 1892, § 388; 1906, § 452; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3872; 1930, § 3933; 1942, § 3068; Laws, Dec. 9, 1811.

§ 19-1-93.
Marshall County.

Marshall County is bounded by beginning on the line between the States of Mississippi and Tennessee at the center of range five, west; thence east on said state line to the line between ranges one and two, west; thence south on said line to the southwest corner of section six, township three, range one, west; thence east on section lines to the southeast corner of section four, township three, range one, west; thence due south on section lines to the southwest corner of section three, township six, range one, west; thence east to the basis meridian; thence south by said meridian to the Tallahatchie River; thence down said river, with its meanderings, to the mouth of Little Spring Creek; thence up said creek to the center of township six; thence west by section lines to the line between ranges four and five, west; thence north to the line between townships four and five; thence west to the center of range five, west; thence due north to the beginning. The county site is Holly Springs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 73; 1871, § 61; 1880, § 65; 1892, § 389; 1906, § 453; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3873; 1930, § 3934; 1942, § 3069; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836.

§ 19-1-95.
Monroe County.

Monroe County is bounded by beginning on the range line between ranges five and six, east, one mile north of the township line between townships eleven and twelve, south; thence east by section lines to the line between the states of Mississippi and Alabama; thence southerly on said state line to a point due east from Robinson’s bluff, on the Buttahatchie River; which is the point where the middle line (east and west) of the north half of south half of section 21, township 15, range 17 west intersects with the center line of said Buttahatchie River immediately west of said Robinson’s bluff, thence due west from said point on said Mississippi and Alabama State line continuing along the subdivision line named through section 19, township 15, range 16 west and sections 24, 23, 22 and 21, township 15, range 17 west to where said subdivision line intersects the center line of Buttahatchie River; thence down said river, with its meanderings, to the Tombigbee River; thence up said river to the point where the section line running east from the northwest corner of section twenty-four, township sixteen, range seven, east, intersects said river; thence west to the line between ranges five and six, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is Aberdeen.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 78; 1871, § 62; 1880, § 66; 1892, § 390; 1906, § 454; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3874; 1930, § 3935; 1942, § 3070; Laws, Feb. 9, 1821; Laws, 1944, ch. 412.

§ 19-1-97.
Montgomery County.

Montgomery County is bounded by beginning on the southern boundary of Grenada County where it crosses the northwest corner of section twenty-one, township twenty-one, range five, east; thence south along section lines to the northwest corner of section twenty-one, township eighteen, range five, east; thence along section lines to the range line between ranges five and six, east; thence south one mile; thence east to the northeast corner of section twenty-seven, township eighteen, range six, east; thence south to the southwest corner of section thirty-five, township seventeen, range six, east; thence west to the Big Black River, and along it, by its meanderings, to the point at which the line between townships sixteen and seventeen crosses said river, thence east on the line of Attala County to the southeast corner of section thirty-three, township seventeen, range eight, east; thence north on section lines to where Big Black River crosses the line between sections fifteen and sixteen, township eighteen, range eight, east; thence up said river to where the township line between townships eighteen and nineteen crosses it; thence west to the northwest corner of township eighteen, range eight, east; thence north to Grenada County; thence to the beginning. The county site is Winona.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 63; 1880, § 67; 1892, § 391; 1906, § 455; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3875; 1930, § 3936; 1942, § 3071; Laws, May 13, 1871.

§ 19-1-99.
Neshoba County.

Neshoba County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township twelve, range ten, east; thence east on the township line to the southeast corner of township thirteen, range twelve, east; thence south with range line to the northwest corner of township twelve, range thirteen, east; thence east with the township line to the northeast corner of section four, township twelve, range thirteen, east; thence south on the line between sections three and four, one-half mile; thence east to the line between sections one and two, township twelve, range thirteen, east; thence north to the northeast corner of section two, township twelve, range thirteen, east; thence east on the township line to the range line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, east; thence south on said range line to the line between townships eight and nine, north; thence west on said township line to the line between ranges nine and ten, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is Philadelphia.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 86; 1871, § 64; 1880, § 68; 1892, § 392; 1906, § 456; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3876; 1930, § 3937; 1942, § 3072; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-101.
Newton County.

Newton County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township eight, north, range ten, east; thence east on the township line to the line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, east; thence south on said range line to the line between townships four and five, north; thence west on said township line to the line between ranges nine and ten, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is Decatur.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 82; 1871, § 65; 1880, § 69; 1892, § 393; 1906, § 457; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3877; 1930, § 3938; 1942, § 3073; Laws, Feb. 23, 1836.

§ 19-1-103.
Noxubee County.

Noxubee County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township sixteen, range fifteen, east; thence east on the township line to the boundary line between the States of Mississippi and Alabama; thence southerly with said boundary line to the line between townships twelve and thirteen, north; thence west with said township line to the line between ranges fourteen and fifteen, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is Macon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 46; 1871, § 66; 1880, § 70; 1892, § 394; 1906, § 458; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3878; 1930, § 3939; 1942, § 3074; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-105.
Oktibbeha County.

Oktibbeha County is bounded by beginning on the range line between ranges eleven and twelve, east, at the southwest corner of section thirty, township twenty, range twelve, east; thence east to the range line between ranges fifteen and sixteen, east; thence south on said range line to the line between townships sixteen and seventeen, north; thence west on said township line to the southwest corner of township seventeen, range twelve, east; thence north on the line between ranges eleven and twelve, east, to the beginning. The county site is Starkville.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 50; 1871, § 67; 1880, § 71; 1892, § 395; 1906, § 459; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3879; 1930, § 3940; 1942, § 3075; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-107.
Panola County.

Panola County is bounded by beginning on the line between ranges nine and ten, west, at the center of township six; thence east on section lines to the center of township six, range five, west; thence south with sectional lines through the center of said range to the line between townships ten and eleven, south; thence west on said township line to the northeast corner of township twenty-six, range one, east; thence north to the line between the Chickasaw and Choctaw cessions; thence along said line to the west boundary of township nine, range nine, west; thence north to the beginning. The county sites are Sardis and Batesville.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 76; 1871, § 68; 1880, § 72; 1892, § 396; 1906, § 460; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3880; 1930, § 3941; 1942, § 3076; Laws, Feb. 8, 1936.

§ 19-1-109.
Pearl River County.

Pearl River County is bounded by beginning at a point on the state line in Pearl River where the thirty-first parallel of latitude crosses said river and running east along said parallel to the southeast corner of township one, north, range sixteen, west; thence north one mile to the line which was the north boundary line of Pearl River County prior to the adoption of the Code of 1930; thence east, parallel with the thirty-first degree of latitude, to the section line between twenty-seven and twenty-eight, township one, north, range fifteen, west; thence south to the said thirty-first parallel of latitude; thence east to the northeast corner of section three, township one, south, range fifteen, west; thence south to the southeast corner of section three, township one, south, range fifteen, west; thence east along section lines to the section corner common to sections five, six, seven, and eight in township one, south, range fourteen, west; thence north to said thirty-first parallel of latitude; thence east one-half mile to the center of section thirty-two of township one, north, range fourteen, west; thence north on half-section line of said section thirty-two to the south line of section twenty-nine; thence east along section lines to the range line between ranges thirteen and fourteen, west; thence south to the said thirty-first parallel of latitude, which point is the southeast corner of section thirty-six, township one, north, range fourteen, west; thence east along the said thirty-first parallel of latitude to the northeast corner of section one, township one, south, range fourteen, west; thence south on the range line to the southeast corner of township four, south, range fourteen, west; thence west to the southeast corner of township four, south, range sixteen, west; thence south on the range line nine miles to the southeast corner of section thirteen, township six, south, range sixteen, west; thence west to the northeast corner of section twenty-one, township six, south, range sixteen, west; thence south to the southeast corner of said section twenty-one, township six, south, range sixteen, west; thence west to the northwest corner of section thirty, township six, south, range sixteen, west; thence along range line between ranges sixteen and seventeen to the southeast corner of section one, township seven, south, range seventeen, west; thence west to Pearl River; thence north along the middle of said river to the point of beginning. The county site is Poplarville.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 397; 1906, § 461; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3881; 1930, § 3942; 1942, § 3077; Laws, Feb. 22, 1890; Laws, 1934, ch. 238.

§ 19-1-111.
Perry County.

Perry County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township five, range eleven, west; thence east on the township line to the line between ranges eight and nine, west; thence south on said range line to the line between townships one and two, south; thence west on said township line to the line between ranges eleven and twelve, west; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is New Augusta.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 69; 1880, § 73; 1892, § 398; 1906, § 462; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3882; 1930, § 3943; 1942, § 3078; Laws, Feb. 3, 1820.

§ 19-1-113.
Pike County.

Pike County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township four, north, range seven, east; thence east on the township line to the northeast corner of section two, township four, north, range nine, east; thence due south along the east line of sections two, eleven, fourteen, twenty-three, twenty-six and thirty-five of townships four, three, two and one respectively to the thirty-first parallel of latitude, being the line between the States of Louisiana and Mississippi; thence west along the said thirty-first degree, being the boundary line between the states aforesaid, to the range line between ranges six and seven, east; thence north along said range line to the point of beginning. The county site is Magnolia.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 70; 1880, § 74; 1892, § 399; 1906, § 463; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3883; 1930, § 3944; 1942, § 3079; Laws, Feb. 9, 1815; Laws, 1908, ch. 153.

§ 19-1-115.
Pontotoc County.

Pontotoc County is bounded by beginning on the basis meridian of the Chickasaw survey at the northwest corner of section nineteen, township eight, range one, east; thence east on the section lines to the northwest corner of section nineteen, township eight, range four, east; thence south to the southwest corner of section nineteen, township eight, range four, east; thence east to the northwest corner of section thirty, township eight, range five, east; thence south on range lines between four and five to the southeast corner of section thirty-six, in township eleven, range four, east; thence west on line between townships eleven and twelve to the basis meridian; thence north to the point of beginning. The county site is Pontotoc.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 71; 1871, § 71; 1880, § 75; 1892, § 400; 1906, § 464; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3884; 1930, § 3945; 1942, § 3080; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836; Laws, 1908, ch. 154.

§ 19-1-117.
Prentiss County.

Prentiss County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of section seven, township four, range six, east; thence east by sectional lines to the northwest corner of section ten, township four, range nine, east; thence south to the southwest corner of said section; thence east to the southeast corner of said section; thence south by sectional lines to the southeast corner of section fifteen, township seven, range nine, east; thence west by sectional lines to the southwest corner of section fourteen, township seven, range seven, east; thence north by sectional lines to the line between townships six and seven; thence west on said township line to the southwest corner of section thirty-six, township six, range five, east; thence north by section lines to the northwest corner of section one in same township and range; thence east to the line between ranges five and six, east; thence north on said line to the beginning. The county site is Booneville.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 72; 1880, § 76; 1892, § 401; 1906, § 465; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3885; 1930, § 3946; 1942, § 3081; Laws, Apr. 15, 1870.

§ 19-1-119.
Quitman County.

Quitman County is bounded by beginning at the northeast corner of Coahoma County, and running thence south with the boundary of Coahoma County to the northeast corner of section thirty-three, township twenty-eight, range two, west; thence west on section lines to the range line between ranges two and three, west; thence south on the range line to the southwest corner of township twenty-six, range two, west; thence east on the township line to the range line between ranges one and two, east; thence north on said line to the boundary line between the Chickasaw and Choctaw cessions; thence northwest with said line to the point at which it touches the western boundary of Panola County; thence north with said boundary to the northeast corner of township seven, range ten, west, of the Chickasaw survey; thence west with the northern line of said township to the northwest corner thereof; thence south with the west line of said township to the township line between townships seven and eight; thence west with said township line to the beginning. The county site is Marks.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 77; 1892, § 402; 1906, § 466; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3886; 1930, § 3947; 1942, § 3082; Laws, Feb. 1, 1877.

§ 19-1-121.
Rankin County.

Rankin County is bounded by beginning on Pearl River, in township nine, range five, east, where the old Choctaw boundary crosses said river; thence southeast with said boundary to where the same intersects the line between ranges five and six, east; thence south with said range line to the line between townships two and three, north; thence west on said township line to Pearl River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the beginning. The county site is Brandon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 73; 1880, § 78; 1892, § 403; 1906, § 467; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3887; 1930, § 3948; 1942, § 3083; Laws, Feb. 4, 1828.

§ 19-1-123.
Scott County.

Scott County is bounded by beginning on the old Choctaw boundary line, where the same crosses Pearl River; thence up said river with its meanderings, to the line between ranges five and six east; thence south on said range line to the line between townships eight and nine, north; thence east on said township line to the line between ranges nine and ten, east; thence south on said range line to the line between townships four and five, north; thence west on said township line to the old Choctaw boundary; thence southerly on said Choctaw boundary to its intersection with the same township line running west; thence west to the line between ranges five and six, east; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the Choctaw boundary; thence north with said boundary line to the beginning. The county site is Forest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 59; 1871, § 75; 1880, § 79; 1892, § 404; 1906, § 468; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3888; 1930, § 3949; 1942, § 3084; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-125.
Sharkey County.

Sharkey County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of section three, township thirteen, range seven, west; thence in a direct line to the north line of township fourteen; thence east along said township line between townships fourteen and fifteen, to the northeast corner of township fourteen, range five, west; thence south along the east boundary lines of township fourteen, north, range five, west, and township thirteen, north, range five, west to the southwest corner of township thirteen, north, range four, west; thence down the west boundary of Yazoo County to where it connects with the Sunflower River, following its meanderings, to the south line of township ten, range five, west; thence west along said township line to the northwest corner of township nine, range seven, west; thence north on the range line between ranges seven and eight to its intersection with the east prong of Steel’s bayou; thence up said east prong, following its meanderings, to the Indian bayou; thence up said Indian bayou, with its meanderings, to where it intersects the west boundary line of section twenty-seven, township thirteen, range seven, west; thence northwardly along the west boundary line of sections twenty-seven, twenty-two, fifteen, ten, and three to the beginning. The county site is Rolling Fork.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 80; 1892, § 405; 1906, § 469; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3889; 1930, § 3950; 1942, § 3085; Laws, Mar. 29, 1876.

§ 19-1-127.
Simpson County.

Simpson County is bounded by beginning on the line between townships two and three, north, where the same crosses Pearl River; thence east on said township line to its intersection with the old Choctaw boundary; thence south with said Choctaw boundary, and on the range line between ranges sixteen and seventeen, west, to the intersection of the Choctaw boundary line; thence westerly with said Choctaw boundary line to Pearl River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the beginning. The county site is Mendenhall.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 25; 1871, § 76; 1880, § 81; 1892, § 406; 1906, § 470; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3890; 1930, § 3951; 1942, § 3086; Laws, Jan. 23, 1824.

§ 19-1-129.
Smith County.

Smith County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township four, range six, east; thence east to the Choctaw boundary; thence northerly with said boundary to the line between townships four and five, north; thence east on said township line to the line between ranges nine and ten, east; thence south on said range line to the Choctaw boundary line; thence west on said boundary line to the line between ranges sixteen and seventeen, west; thence north to the Choctaw boundary line; thence northwest to the line between townships two and three, north; thence west on said township line to the line between ranges five and six, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is Raleigh.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 58; 1871, § 74; 1880, § 82; 1892, § 407; 1906, § 471; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3891; 1930, § 3952; 1942, § 3087; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-131.
Stone County.

Stone County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of section six, township two, south, range thirteen, west; thence running south along the eastern boundary line of Pearl River County to the southwest corner of section thirty-one, township four, south, range thirteen, west; thence running east to the southeast corner of section thirty-six, township four, south, range thirteen, west; thence running north to the northeast corner of section twenty-five, township four, south, range thirteen, west; thence running east to the southeast corner of section twenty-one, township four, south, range nine, west; thence running north along the eastern boundary line of Jackson and George Counties to the northeast corner of section four, township two, south, range nine, west; thence running west to the point of beginning. The county site is Wiggins.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3892; 1930, § 3953; 1942, § 3088; Laws, 1916, ch. 527.